Maryland, session 2026, HB0983.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Economic Development
5–704.
(a) (1) The Secretary may designate an area as an enterprise zone only if the
area:
(i) is in a priority funding area or in a qualified opportunity zone
under § 1400Z–1 of the Internal Revenue Code in Allegany County, Garrett County,
Somerset County, or Wicomico County or meets an exception under Title 5, Subtitle 7B of
the State Finance and Procurement Article; and
(ii) satisfies at least one of the requirements specified in paragraph
(2) of this subsection.
(2) An area may be designated as an enterprise zone if:
(i) the average rate of unemployment in EACH CENSUS TRACT
WITHIN the area, or within a reasonable proximity to the area but in the same county IF
FEWER THAN 1,500 INDIVIDUALS RESIDE IN A CENSUS TRACT WITHIN THE AREA, for
the most recent 18–month period for which data are available is at least 150% of the greater
of the average rate of unemployment in either the State or the United States during that
period;
(ii) the population in EACH CENSUS TRACT WITHIN the area, or
within a reasonable proximity to the area but in the same county IF FEWER THAN 1,500
INDIVIDUALS RESIDE IN A CENSUS TRACT WITHIN THE AREA, qualifies the area as a
low–income poverty area;

HOUSE BILL 983
(iii) at least 70% of the families in EACH CENSUS TRACT WITHIN
the area, or within a reasonable proximity to the area but in the same county IF FEWER
THAN 1,500 INDIVIDUALS RESIDE IN A CENSUS TRACT WITHIN THE AREA, have
incomes that are less than 80% of the median family income in the political subdivision
that contains the area; or
(iv) the population in EACH CENSUS TRACT WITHIN the area, or
within a reasonable proximity to the area but in the same county IF FEWER THAN 1,500
INDIVIDUALS RESIDE IN A CENSUS TRACT WITHIN THE AREA, decreased by 10%
between the most recent two censuses, and the political subdivision can demonstrate to the
Secretary’s satisfaction that:
1. chronic abandonment or demolition of property is
occurring in the area; or
2. substantial property tax arrearages exist in the area.
(b) (1) Within 60 days after a submission date, the Secretary may designate
one or more enterprise zones from among the areas described in the applications timely
submitted.
(2) The designation of an area as an enterprise zone is effective for 10
years.
(3) The Secretary may not designate more than six enterprise zones in a
calendar year.
(4) IF THE SECRETARY REASONABLY ANTICIPATES THAT THE
AGGREGATE AMOUNT OF PROPERTY TAX CREDITS CLAIMED UNDER § 9–103 OF THE
TAX – PROPERTY ARTICLE FOR THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR MAY
EXCEED $60,000,000, THE SECRETARY MAY NOT DESIGNATE A NEW ENTERPRISE
ZONE DURING THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR.
[(4)] (5) A county may not receive more than two enterprise zones in a
calendar year.
5–705.
(a) (1) A political subdivision may apply to the Secretary to expand an existing
enterprise zone in the same manner as the political subdivision would apply to designate a
new enterprise zone.
(2) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION,
THE Secretary may grant an expansion of an enterprise zone into an area that meets the
requirements of § 5–704 of this subtitle.

HOUSE BILL 983 5
(3) For purposes of § 5–704(b) of this subtitle, an expansion of an enterprise
zone that does not exceed 25% of the existing geographic area of the enterprise zone does
not count towards the limit on the number of enterprise zones that:
(i) the Secretary may designate in a calendar year; or
(ii) a county may receive in a calendar year.
(b) (1) The Secretary may grant one extraordinary expansion of an enterprise
zone in the State each calendar year for an area that:
(i) meets the requirements of § 5–704 of this subtitle; and
(ii) in the determination of the Secretary, has suffered a significant
loss of economic base or merits inclusion in an enterprise zone for a compelling economic
reason.
(2) For purposes of § 5–704(b) of this subtitle, an extraordinary expansion
of an enterprise zone IS NOT SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATION UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF
THIS SECTION AND does not count towards the limit on the number of enterprise zones
that:
(i) the Secretary may designate in a calendar year; or
(ii) a county may receive in a calendar year.
(C) IF THE SECRETARY REASONABLY ANTICIPATES THAT THE AGGREGATE
AMOUNT OF PROPERTY TAX CREDITS CLAIMED UNDER § 9–103 OF THE
TAX – PROPERTY ARTICLE FOR THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR MAY
EXCEED $60,000,000, THE SECRETARY MAY NOT GRANT AN EXPANSION OF AN
EXISTING ENTERPRISE ZONE DURING THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR.
5–706.
(a) A political subdivision may request the Secretary to designate all or part of an
enterprise zone as a focus area for the lesser of:
(1) 5 years; or
(2) the remainder of the 10–year term of the applicable enterprise zone.
(b) The request may be made on or before a submission date when the political
subdivision applies for the designation of a new enterprise zone or after the Secretary has
designated an enterprise zone.

HOUSE BILL 983
(c) The Secretary may grant the request if the area is located in an enterprise
zone and meets at least three of the following criteria:
(1) the average unemployment rate in EACH CENSUS TRACT WITHIN the
area, or within a reasonable proximity to the area but in the same county IF FEWER THAN
1,500 INDIVIDUALS RESIDE IN A CENSUS TRACT WITHIN THE AREA, for the most recent
18–month period for which data are available is at least 150% of the greater of the average
rate of unemployment in either the State or the United States during that same period;
(2) the population in EACH CENSUS TRACT WITHIN the area, or within a
reasonable proximity to the area but in the same county IF FEWER THAN 1,500
INDIVIDUALS RESIDE IN A CENSUS TRACT WITHIN THE AREA, has an incidence of
poverty that is at least 150% of the national average;
(3) the crime rate in EACH CENSUS TRACT WITHIN the area, or within a
reasonable proximity to the area but in the same county IF FEWER THAN 1,500
INDIVIDUALS RESIDE IN A CENSUS TRACT WITHIN THE AREA, is at least 150% of the
crime rate in the political subdivision where the area is located;
(4) the percentage of substandard housing in EACH CENSUS TRACT
WITHIN the area, or within a reasonable proximity to the area but in the same county IF
FEWER THAN 1,500 INDIVIDUALS RESIDE IN A CENSUS TRACT WITHIN THE AREA, is
at least 200% of the percentage of housing units in the State that are substandard,
according to data from the United States Bureau of the Census or other State or federal
government data the Secretary considers appropriate; or
(5) at least 20% of the square footage of commercial property in EACH
CENSUS TRACT WITHIN the area, or within a reasonable proximity to the area but within
the same county IF FEWER THAN 1,500 INDIVIDUALS RESIDE IN A CENSUS TRACT
WITHIN THE AREA, is vacant, according to data from the United States Bureau of the
Census or other State or federal government data the Secretary considers appropriate.
5–707.
(a) To the extent provided for in this section, a business entity is entitled to:
(1) the special property tax credit in § 9–103 of the Tax – Property Article;
(2) the income tax credits in § 10–702 of the Tax – General Article; and
(3) consideration for financial assistance from programs in Subtitle 1 of
this title.
(d) (1) Except as provided in § 10–702 of the Tax – General Article and §
9–103 of the Tax – Property Article, the incentives and initiatives set forth in this section
are available for 10 years after the date that an area is designated an enterprise zone.

HOUSE BILL 983 7
(2) (I) A law enacted after the enactment of this section that eliminates
or reduces the benefits available to a business entity under this section does not apply to a
business entity that was in an enterprise zone before the effective date of the law.
(II) A BUSINESS ENTITY THAT LOCATES IN AN ENTERPRISE
ZONE BEFORE THE TERMINATION DATE OF THIS SUBTITLE PROVIDED UNDER §
5–710 OF THIS SUBTITLE REMAINS ELIGIBLE FOR THE BENEFITS AVAILABLE TO A
BUSINESS ENTITY UNDER THIS SECTION, PROVIDED THAT THE BUSINESS ENTITY
MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS AND CONDITIONS OF THE CODE SECTION APPLICABLE
TO THE BENEFIT.
5–710.
THIS SUBTITLE AND, EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 5–707(D)(2) OF THIS
SUBTITLE, ELIGIBILITY FOR THE TAX CREDITS PROVIDED UNDER § 5–707(A) OF THIS
SUBTITLE SHALL TERMINATE ON JANUARY 1, 2031.
6–407.
(A) THIS SUBTITLE AND THE TAX CREDIT AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE SHALL TERMINATE ON JANUARY 1, 2027.
(B) AFTER THE TERMINATION OF THIS SUBTITLE, TAX CREDITS EARNED
MAY BE CARRIED FORWARD IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 6–403 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–204.
(a) To the extent excluded from federal adjusted gross income, the amounts under
this section are added to the federal adjusted gross income of a resident to determine
Maryland adjusted gross income.
(M) THE ADDITION UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION INCLUDES ANY
AMOUNT DEDUCTED UNDER § 857 OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE FOR
DIVIDENDS PAID FOR REAL ESTATE INVESTMENT TRUSTS.
10–305.

HOUSE BILL 983
(a) To the extent excluded from federal taxable income, the amounts under this
section are added to the federal taxable income of a corporation to determine Maryland
modified income.
(b) The addition under subsection (a) of this section includes the net capital loss
carryback, as defined in § 1212 of the Internal Revenue Code.
(c) The addition under subsection (a) of this section includes any taxes based on
net income that are imposed by any state or by a political subdivision of any state.
(d) The addition under subsection (a) of this section includes the additions
required for an individual under:
(1) § 10–204(b) of this title (Dividends and interest from another state or
local obligation);
(2) § 10–204(c)(2) of this title (Federal tax–exempt income);
(3) § 10–204(e) of this title (Oil percentage depletion allowance);
(4) § 10–204(i) of this title (Deduction for qualified production activities
income);
(5) § 10–204(j) of this title (Deduction for costs for security clearance
administrative expenses and construction and equipment costs incurred to construct or
renovate a sensitive compartmented information facility); [and]
(6) § 10–204(l) of this title (Deduction for donations to qualified permanent
endowment funds); AND
(7) § 10–204(M) OF THIS TITLE (DEDUCTION FOR DIVIDENDS PAID
FOR REAL ESTATE INVESTMENT TRUSTS).
[10–306.2.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) (i) “Captive REIT” means a corporation, trust, or association:
1. that is considered a real estate investment trust for the
taxable year under § 856 of the Internal Revenue Code;
2. that is not regularly traded on an established securities
market; and
3. of which more than 50% of the voting power or value of the

HOUSE BILL 983 9
beneficial interests or shares, at any time during the last half of the taxable year, is owned
or controlled, directly or indirectly, by a single entity that is subject to the provisions of
Subchapter C of Chapter 1 of the Internal Revenue Code.
(ii) “Captive REIT” does not include:
1. a corporation, trust, or association of which, at any time
during which the corporation, trust, or association satisfies subparagraph (i)3 of this
paragraph, more than 50% of the voting power or value of the beneficial interests or shares
of the corporation, trust, or association is owned or controlled, directly or indirectly, by:
A. a real estate investment trust other than a real estate
investment trust described in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph;
B. a person exempt from taxation under § 501 of the Internal
Revenue Code;
C. a listed Australian property trust, or an entity organized
as a trust in which a listed Australian property trust owns or controls, directly or indirectly,
75% or more of the voting power or value of the beneficial interests or shares of the trust;
or
D. a qualified foreign entity; or
2. subject to regulations that the Comptroller adopts, a real
estate investment trust that is intended to become regularly traded on an established
securities market and that satisfies the requirements of § 856(a)(5) and (6) of the Internal
Revenue Code by reason of § 856(h)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(3) “Qualified foreign entity” means a corporation, trust, association, or
partnership that is organized under the laws of a foreign government and:
(i) at least 75% of the total asset value of the entity at the close of
the entity’s taxable year is represented by real estate assets, as defined in § 856 of the
Internal Revenue Code, cash and cash equivalents, and United States government
securities;
(ii) 1. is not subject to tax on amounts distributed to the entity’s
beneficial owners; or
2. is exempt from entity–level taxation;
(iii) on an annual basis, distributes at least 85% of the taxable income
of the entity, as computed in the jurisdiction in which the entity is organized, to the holders
of the shares or certificates of the beneficial interests of the entity;
(iv) 1. of which not more than 10% of the voting power or value

HOUSE BILL 983
of the beneficial interests or shares of the entity is owned or controlled directly, indirectly,
or constructively by a single entity or individual; or
2. the beneficial interests or shares of the entity are
regularly traded on an established securities market; and
(v) the entity is organized in a foreign country that has a tax treaty
with the United States government.
(b) In addition to the modifications under §§ 10–305 through 10–306.1 of this
subtitle, an amount equal to the amount of the dividends paid deduction allowed under the
Internal Revenue Code for the taxable year is added to federal taxable income to determine
the Maryland modified income of a captive REIT.
(c) For purposes of this section, the constructive ownership rules prescribed
under § 318(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, as modified by § 856(d)(5) of the Internal
Revenue Code, shall apply in determining the ownership of stock, assets, or net profits of
any person.]
10–702.
(b) (1) [Any] SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS OF THIS SECTION, ANY
business entity that is located in an enterprise zone and satisfies the requirements of §
5–707 of the Economic Development Article may claim a credit only against the State
income tax for the wages specified in subsections (c) and (d) of this section that are paid in
the taxable year for which the entity claims the credit.
(2) [A] SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS OF THIS SECTION, A business
entity that is located in a focus area and satisfies the requirements of § 5–707 of the
Economic Development Article may claim a credit only against the State income tax for the
wages specified in subsection (e) of this section that are paid to a focus area employee in
the taxable year for which the entity claims the credit.
(3) An organization that is exempt from taxation under § 501(c)(3) or (4) of
the Internal Revenue Code may apply the credit under this section as a credit against
income tax due on unrelated business taxable income as provided under §§ 10–304 and
10–812 of this title.
(F) (1) THE CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE CLAIMED
ON A FIRST–COME, FIRST–SERVED BASIS.
(2) FOR ANY TAXABLE YEAR:
(I) THE CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY NOT
EXCEED $250,000; AND

HOUSE BILL 983 11
(II) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF CREDITS CLAIMED BY BUSINESS
ENTITIES MAY NOT EXCEED $2,000,000.
[(f)] (G) If the credit allowed under this section in any taxable year exceeds the
State income tax for that taxable year, a business entity may apply the excess as a credit
against the State income tax for succeeding taxable years until the earlier of:
(1) the full amount of the excess is used; or
(2) the expiration of the 5th taxable year from the date on which the
business entity hired the qualified employee to whom the credit first applies.
[(g)] (H) If a credit is claimed under this section, the claimant must make the
addition required in § 10–205, § 10–206, or § 10–306 of this title.
10–725.
(c) (3) (ii) The Department may not issue any tax credit certificates under
this section after June 30, [2028] 2026.
10–730.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Department” means the Department of Commerce.
(3) “Digital animation project” means the creation, development, and
production of computer–generated animation content for distribution or exhibition to the
general public.
(4) (i) “Film production activity” means:
1. the production of a film or video project that is intended
for nationwide commercial distribution; and
2. for a television series, each season of the television series.
(ii) “Film production activity” includes the production of:
1. a feature film;
2. a television project;
3. a commercial;
4. a corporate film;

HOUSE BILL 983
5. a music video;
6. a digital animation project;
7. a documentary; or
8. a talk, reality, or game show.
(iii) “Film production activity” does not include production of:
1. a student film;
2. a noncommercial personal video;
3. a sports broadcast;
4. a broadcast of a live event;
5. a video, computer, or social networking game;
6. pornography;
7. an infomercial;
8. a digital project or an animation project other than a
digital animation project; or
9. a multimedia project.
(5) “Maryland small or independent film entity” means a qualified film
production entity that:
(i) has been incorporated in Maryland for at least 3 months;
(ii) is independently owned and operated;
(iii) is not a subsidiary of another entity;
(iv) is not dominant in its field of operation;
(v) employs 25 or fewer full–time employees; and
(vi) employs Maryland residents as at least 40% of its workforce in
the film production activity.

HOUSE BILL 983 13
(6) “Pornography” means any production for which records are required to
be maintained under § 2257 of Title 18, U.S.C., with respect to any performer in such
production engaging in sexually explicit conduct.
(7) “Qualified film production entity” means an entity that:
(i) is carrying out a film production activity; and
(ii) the Secretary determines to be eligible for the tax credit under
this section in accordance with subsection [(c)] (D) of this section.
(8) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Commerce.
(9) “Television series” means a group of program episodes intended for
television broadcast or transmission with a common series title, with or without a
predetermined number of episodes, and shall include a miniseries and a pilot episode
produced for an intended television series.
(10) (i) “Total direct costs”, with respect to a film production activity,
means the total costs incurred in the State that are necessary to carry out the film
production activity.
(ii) “Total direct costs” includes costs incurred for:
1. employee wages and benefits;
2. fees for services;
3. acquiring or leasing property;
4. salaries, wages, or other compensation for writers,
directors, or producers; and
5. any other expense necessary to carry out a film production
activity, including costs associated with:
A. set construction and operation;
B. wardrobe, makeup, and related services;
C. photography and sound synchronization, lighting, and
related services and materials;
D. editing and related services, including film processing,
transfers of film to tape or digital format, sound mixing, computer graphic services, special
effects services, and animation services;

HOUSE BILL 983
E. salary, wages, and other compensation including related
benefits, for work performed in the State, paid to persons employed in the production;
F. rental of facilities in the State and equipment used in the
State;
G. leasing of vehicles;
H. food and lodging;
I. music, if performed, composed, or recorded by a Maryland
musician or published by a person or company domiciled in Maryland;
J. travel expenses incurred to bring persons employed, either
directly or indirectly, in the production of the project to Maryland, but not including
expenses of these persons departing from Maryland; and
K. legal and accounting services performed by attorneys or
accountants licensed in Maryland.
(iii) “Total direct costs” does not include any salary, wages, or other
compensation for personal services of an individual who receives more than $500,000 in
salary, wages, or other compensation for personal services in connection with any film
production activity.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE TAX CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION IS
TO INCENTIVIZE AND PROMOTE FILM PRODUCTION ACTIVITY IN THE STATE TO
STIMULATE THE LOCAL ECONOMY BY CREATING JOBS, FOSTERING INVESTMENT IN
INDUSTRY INFRASTRUCTURE, AND BOOSTING TOURISM.
[(b)] (C) (1) A qualified film production entity may claim a credit against the
State income tax for film production activities in the State in an amount equal to the
amount stated in the final tax credit certificate approved by the Secretary for film
production activities.
(2) If the tax credit allowed under this section in any taxable year exceeds
the total tax otherwise payable by the qualified film production entity for that taxable year,
the qualified film production entity may claim a refund in the amount of the excess.
[(c)] (D) (1) Before beginning a film production activity, a film production
entity shall submit to the Department an application to qualify as a film production entity.
(2) The application shall describe the anticipated film production activity,
including:
(i) the projected total budget;

HOUSE BILL 983 15
(ii) the estimated number of Maryland resident and out–of–state
employees and total wages to be paid; and
(iii) the anticipated dates for carrying out the major elements of the
film production activity.
(3) Except as provided in subsection [(h)] (I) of this section, to qualify as a
film production entity, the estimated total direct costs incurred in the State must exceed
$250,000.
(4) The application shall include any other information required by the
Secretary.
(5) For a film production entity with total direct costs that exceed $250,000,
the Secretary may require the information provided in an application to be verified by an
independent auditor selected and paid for by the film production entity seeking
certification.
(6) The Secretary shall:
(i) determine if the film production entity qualifies for the credit
under this section; and
(ii) notify the Comptroller of the estimated amount of total direct
costs and the taxable year the credit will be claimed.
[(d)] (E) (1) After completion of the film production activity, a qualified film
production entity shall apply to the Department for a tax credit certificate.
(2) The application shall be on a form required by the Secretary and shall
include:
(i) proof of the total direct costs that qualify for the tax credit; and
(ii) the number of employees hired and wages paid.
(3) Subject to subsections [(f)] (G) and [(h)] (I) of this section, the Secretary
shall determine the total direct costs that qualify for the tax credit and issue a tax credit
certificate for:
(i) except as provided in item (ii) of this paragraph, 28% of the total
direct costs that qualify for the tax credit; and
(ii) for a television series, 30% of the total direct costs that qualify
for the tax credit.

HOUSE BILL 983
[(e)] (F) In accordance with § 2.5–109 of the Economic Development Article, the
Department shall submit a report on film production activity in the State and the economic
benefits to the State resulting from film production activity during the reporting period.
[(f)] (G) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the
Secretary may not issue tax credit certificates for credit amounts in the aggregate totaling
more than:
(i) for fiscal year 2014, $25,000,000;
(ii) for fiscal year 2015, $7,500,000;
(iii) for fiscal year 2016, $7,500,000;
(iv) for fiscal year 2019, $8,000,000;
(v) for fiscal year 2020, $11,000,000;
(vi) for fiscal years 2021 through 2023, $12,000,000;
(vii) for fiscal year 2024, $15,000,000;
(viii) for fiscal year 2025, $17,500,000; and
(ix) for fiscal year 2026 and each fiscal year thereafter, $12,000,000.
(2) (I) [If] SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH,
IF the aggregate credit amounts under the tax credit certificates issued by the Secretary
total less than the maximum provided under paragraph (1) of this subsection in any fiscal
year, any excess amount may be carried forward and issued under tax credit certificates in
a subsequent fiscal year.
(II) THE AGGREGATE AMOUNT CARRIED FORWARD FROM ALL
PRIOR FISCAL YEARS IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH MAY NOT EXCEED $12,000,000.
(3) The Secretary may not issue tax credit certificates for credit amounts
totaling more than $10,000,000 in the aggregate for a single film production activity.
(4) (i) For fiscal year 2019 and each fiscal year thereafter, the Secretary
shall make 10% of the credit amount authorized under paragraph (1) of this subsection
available for Maryland small or independent film entities.
(ii) If the total amount of credits applied for by Maryland small or
independent film entities is less than the amount made available under subparagraph (i)

HOUSE BILL 983 17
of this paragraph, the Secretary shall make available the unused amount of credits for use
by qualified film production entities.
[(g)] (H) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a qualified
film production entity that receives a tax credit certificate under this section for a film
production activity shall include:
(i) for a feature film project, a 5–second long static or animated logo
that promotes the State in the end credits before the below–the–line crew crawl for the life
of the project and a link to the State’s website on the project’s website;
(ii) for a television series project, an embedded 5–second long static
or animated logo that promotes the State during each broadcast worldwide for the life of
the project and a link to the State’s website on the project’s website; or
(iii) for any other project, the State logo at the end of each project and
in online promotions.
(2) In lieu of including a State logo as required under paragraph (1) of this
subsection, the qualified film production entity may offer alternative marketing
opportunities to be evaluated by the Department to ensure that those opportunities offer
equal or greater promotional value to the State.
[(h)] (I) (1) For a Maryland small or independent film entity to qualify as a
film production entity:
(i) the estimated total direct costs incurred in the State shall exceed
$25,000; and
(ii) at least 50% of the filming of the film production activity must
occur within the State.
(2) The Secretary shall determine the total direct costs that qualify for the
tax credit and issue a tax credit certificate to a Maryland small or independent film entity
for 28% of the total direct costs that qualify for the tax credit, not to exceed $125,000.
[(i)] (J) The Department and the Comptroller jointly shall adopt regulations to
carry out the provisions of this section and to specify criteria and procedures for the
application for, approval of, and monitoring of continuing eligibility for the tax credit under
this section.
10–732.
(b) (1) Subject to the limitations of this section, for a taxable year beginning
after December 31, 2022, but before January 1, [2028] 2027, an individual or a corporation
that employs not more than 500 employees may claim credits against the State income tax
for:

HOUSE BILL 983
(i) security clearance administrative expenses, not to exceed
$200,000;
(ii) expenses incurred for rental payments owed during the first year
of a rental agreement for spaces leased in the State if the individual or corporation is a
small business that performs security–based contracting, not to exceed $200,000; and
(iii) subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, construction and
equipment costs incurred to construct or renovate a single SCIF in an amount equal to the
lesser of 50% of the costs or $200,000.
10–733.1.
(d) (3) (i) The total amount of the credit certificates approved by the
Secretary of Commerce under this subsection may not exceed:
1. for taxable year 2018, $2,000,000; and
2. for taxable [year] YEARS 2019 [and each taxable year
thereafter] THROUGH 2026, $4,000,000.
(ii) For each taxable year, the Secretary of Commerce shall award
25% of the amount of tax credits authorized under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph to
qualified buyers that purchase cybersecurity services.
(III) THE SECRETARY OF COMMERCE MAY NOT AWARD TAX
CREDITS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION FOR A TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING AFTER
DECEMBER 31, 2026.
10–734.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Administration” means the Motor Vehicle Administration.
(3) “Qualified vehicle” means a Class F (tractor) vehicle described under §
13–923 of the Transportation Article that is titled and registered in the State.
(b) Subject to the limitations of this section, an individual or a corporation
HEADQUARTERED IN THE STATE that obtains a tax credit certificate from the
Administration may claim a credit against the State income tax for the expense of
registering a qualified vehicle in the State during the taxable year.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:

HOUSE BILL 983 19
Article – Tax – General
[9–315.
(a) A licensed dealer or licensed special fuel seller shall deduct 0.5% of the 1st 10
cents of the motor fuel tax on each gallon of motor fuel, as a discount:
(1) instead of an allowance for evaporation, shrinkage, and handling; and
(2) to reimburse the licensed dealer or licensed special fuel seller for
expenses incurred for the State in:
(i) keeping records;
(ii) collecting and paying the tax; and
(iii) preparing reports.
(b) (1) This subsection does not apply to:
(i) any aviation gasoline; or
(ii) any other motor fuel on which the motor fuel tax has not been
paid.
(2) From the discount under subsection (a) of this section:
(i) a licensed dealer who sells gasoline to a retail service station
dealer shall deduct on the bill 1/2 of the discount;
(ii) a licensed dealer who sells gasoline to a licensed distributor or
licensed special fuel seller shall deduct on the bill 2/3 of the discount;
(iii) a licensed distributor who sells motor fuel to a retail service
station dealer shall deduct on the bill 1/3 of the discount;
(iv) a licensed special fuel seller who sells special fuel to a retail
service station dealer shall deduct on the bill 1/2 of the discount;
(v) a licensed special fuel seller who sells special fuel to a licensed
distributor shall deduct on the bill 2/3 of the discount; and
(vi) a licensed special fuel seller who sells gasoline to a licensed
distributor shall deduct on the bill 1/3 of the discount.]
11–210.

HOUSE BILL 983
(a) [The sales and use tax does not apply to a sale of:
(1) machinery or equipment used to produce bituminous concrete; or
(2) electricity, fuel, and other utilities used to operate that machinery or
equipment.
(b)] The sales and use tax does not apply to a sale of:
(1) tangible personal property, a digital code, or a digital product used
directly and predominantly in a production activity at any stage of operation on the
production activity site from the handling of raw material or components to the movement
of the finished product, if the tangible personal property, digital code, or digital product is
not installed so that it becomes real property;
(2) a melting, smelting, heating, or annealing coke oven, aluminum
furnace, anode bake oven, electrolytic pot, cathode, refractory, or other material used in
relining and rebuilding a furnace or oven; or
(3) a foundation to support other machinery or equipment or an item
required to conform to an air or water pollution law and normally considered part of real
property.
[(c)] (B) The sales and use tax does not apply to a sale of equipment that is used
by a retail food vendor to manufacture or process bread or bakery goods for resale if:
(1) the taxable price of each piece of equipment is at least $2,000; and
(2) the retail food vendor operates a substantial grocery or market
business, as defined in § 11–206(a) of this subtitle, at the same location where the food is
sold.
[(d) The sales and use tax does not apply to the sale, on or after January 1, 2000,
but before January 1, 2008, of machinery or equipment:
(1) that enables a television or radio station to originate and broadcast or
to receive and broadcast digital signals; and
(2) that was or is purchased to comply with or to facilitate compliance with
the Telecommunications Act of 1996, Pub. L. 104–104, 110 Stat. 56.]
[(e)] (C) The sales and use tax does not apply to the sale of:
(1) machinery or equipment used directly and predominantly to produce
Energy Star windows or Energy Star entry doors for residential real property; or

HOUSE BILL 983 21
(2) electricity, fuel, and other utilities used to operate that machinery or
equipment.
[11–232.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) (i) “Construction material” means an item of tangible personal
property that is used to construct or renovate a building, a structure, or an improvement
on land and that typically loses its separate identity as personal property once incorporated
into the real property.
(ii) “Construction material” includes building materials, building
systems equipment, landscaping materials, and supplies.
(3) “Target redevelopment area” means any real property owned or leased
by a person in Baltimore County that:
(i) was previously owned at any time by Bethlehem Steel
Corporation, or any of its subsidiaries; and
(ii) was, as of January 1, 2016, the subject of an approved application
for participation in the Voluntary Cleanup Program under Title 7, Subtitle 5 of the
Environment Article.
(4) “Warehousing equipment” means equipment used for material
handling and storage, including racking systems, conveying systems, and computer
systems and equipment.
(b) The sales and use tax does not apply to a sale of construction material or
warehousing equipment, if:
(1) the material or equipment is purchased by a person solely for use in a
target redevelopment area; and
(2) the buyer provides the vendor with evidence of eligibility for the
exemption issued by the Comptroller.]
12–104.
(b) The tobacco tax does not apply to:
(3) cigarettes or other tobacco products that:
(i) a consumer brings into the State:

HOUSE BILL 983
1. if the quantity brought from another state does not exceed
other tobacco products having a retail value of $100 or [5 cartons] 1 CARTON of cigarettes;
or
2. if the quantity brought from a United States armed forces
installation or reservation does not exceed other tobacco products having a retail value of
$100 or [5 cartons] 1 CARTON of cigarettes;
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
9–103.
(b) (1) The governing body of a county or of a municipal corporation shall grant
a tax credit under this section against the property tax imposed on the eligible assessment
of qualified property.
(d) (1) Except as provided in [paragraph (2)] PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) of
this subsection, AND SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATION UNDER PARAGRAPH (7) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, the appropriate governing body shall calculate the amount of the tax credit
under this section equal to a percentage of the amount of property tax imposed on the
eligible assessment of the qualified property, as follows:
(i) 80% in each of the 1st 5 taxable years following the calendar year
in which the property initially becomes a qualified property;
(ii) 70% in the 6th taxable year;
(iii) 60% in the 7th taxable year;
(iv) 50% in the 8th taxable year;
(v) 40% in the 9th taxable year; and
(vi) 30% in the 10th taxable year.
(2) For newly constructed qualified property that provides both office and
retail space and became eligible for the credit under this section on or after January 1,
2019, but before January 1, [2022] 2020, the appropriate governing body shall calculate
the amount of the tax credit under this section equal to a percentage of the amount of
property tax imposed on the eligible assessment of the qualified property as follows:
(i) 80% in each of the 1st [8] 7 taxable years following the calendar
year in which the property initially becomes a qualified property;

HOUSE BILL 983 23
(ii) 70% in the [9th] 8TH taxable year;
(iii) 60% in the [10th] 9TH taxable year;
(iv) 50% in the [11th] 10TH taxable year;
(v) 40% in the [12th] 11TH taxable year; and
(vi) 30% in the [13th] 12TH taxable year.
(3) FOR NEWLY CONSTRUCTED QUALIFIED PROPERTY THAT
PROVIDES BOTH OFFICE AND RETAIL SPACE AND BECAME ELIGIBLE FOR THE
CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2020, BUT BEFORE
JANUARY 1, 2021, THE APPROPRIATE GOVERNING BODY SHALL CALCULATE THE
AMOUNT OF THE TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION EQUAL TO A PERCENTAGE OF
THE AMOUNT OF PROPERTY TAX IMPOSED ON THE ELIGIBLE ASSESSMENT OF THE
QUALIFIED PROPERTY AS FOLLOWS:
(I) 80% IN EACH OF THE 1ST 6 TAXABLE YEARS FOLLOWING
THE CALENDAR YEAR IN WHICH THE PROPERTY INITIALLY BECOMES A QUALIFIED
PROPERTY;
(II) 70% IN THE 7TH TAXABLE YEAR;
(III) 60% IN THE 8TH TAXABLE YEAR;
(IV) 50% IN THE 9TH TAXABLE YEAR;
(V) 40% IN THE 10TH TAXABLE YEAR; AND
(VI) 30% IN THE 11TH TAXABLE YEAR.
[(3)] (4) The Department shall allocate the eligible assessment to the
nonresidential part of the qualified property at the same percentage as the square footage
of the nonresidential part is to the total square footage of the building.
[(4)] (5) For purposes of calculating the amount of the credit allowed
under this section, the amount of property tax imposed on the eligible assessment shall be
calculated without reduction for any credits allowed under this title.
[(5)] (6) For qualified property located in a focus area, the appropriate
governing body shall calculate the amount of the tax credit under this section equal to 80%
of the amount of property tax imposed on the eligible assessment of the qualified property
for each of the 10 taxable years following the calendar year in which the property initially

HOUSE BILL 983
becomes a qualified property:
(i) for newly constructed qualified property that provides both office
and retail space and became eligible for the credit under this section on or after January 1,
2019, but before January 1, 2022, for each of the 13 taxable years following the calendar
year in which the property initially becomes a qualified property; or
(ii) for any other qualified property, for each of the 10 taxable years
following the calendar year in which the property initially becomes a qualified property.
(7) FOR ANY TAXABLE YEAR, THE AMOUNT OF A PROPERTY TAX
CREDIT GRANTED UNDER THIS SECTION TO A QUALIFIED PROPERTY MAY NOT
EXCEED $500,000.
9–230.
(b) (1) The Mayor and City Council of Baltimore City or the governing body of
a county or of a municipal corporation may enact legislation necessary to grant either
property tax credits, enhanced property tax credits, or both types of property tax credits
against the county or municipal corporation property tax imposed on real property owned
or leased by business entities that meet the requirements specified for the applicable tax
credit under this section and on personal property owned by business entities that meet the
requirements specified under this section.
(2) (i) [If] FOR TAXABLE YEARS ENDING BEFORE JANUARY 1,
2027, IF a property tax credit is granted under paragraph (1) of this subsection, a business
entity that meets the requirements for the property tax credit under this section and
obtains certification from the county or municipal corporation may claim a State tax credit
against the individual or corporate income tax, insurance premiums tax, or financial
institution franchise tax as provided under subsection (c)(3) of this section.
(ii) [If] FOR TAXABLE YEARS ENDING BEFORE JANUARY 1,
2027, IF an enhanced property tax credit is granted under this section and a business
entity and its affiliates meet the requirements for the enhanced property tax credit and
obtain certification from the county or municipal corporation, the business entity or any of
its affiliates may claim a State tax credit against the individual or corporate income tax,
insurance premiums tax, or financial institution franchise tax as provided under subsection
(d)(5) of this section.
(c) (3) [On] FOR TAXABLE YEARS ENDING BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, AND
ON receipt of notification under subsection (b)(7) of this section that a business entity has
been certified for a property tax credit under this subsection, the Department shall compute
and certify to the Comptroller or, in the case of the insurance premiums tax, the Maryland
Insurance Commissioner the amount of the State tax credit authorized under this
subsection that may be claimed against the individual or corporate income tax, insurance
premiums tax, or financial institution franchise tax that would otherwise be due to equal a

HOUSE BILL 983 25
percentage of the amount of property tax imposed on the assessment of the new or expanded
premises, as follows:
(i) 28% in the 1st and 2nd taxable years;
(ii) 21% in the 3rd and 4th taxable years;
(iii) 14% in the 5th and 6th taxable years; and
(iv) 0% for each taxable year thereafter.
(d) (5) [On] FOR TAXABLE YEARS ENDING BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, AND
ON receipt of notification under subsection (b)(7) of this section that a business entity has
been certified for an enhanced property tax credit under this subsection, the Department
shall compute and certify to the Comptroller or, in the case of the insurance premiums tax,
the Maryland Insurance Commissioner the amount of the State tax credit authorized under
this subsection that may be claimed by the business entity or any of its affiliates against
the individual or corporate income tax, insurance premiums tax, or financial institution
franchise tax that would otherwise be due to equal 31.5% of the amount of property tax
imposed on the increase in assessment of the real and personal property described in
paragraph (4)(ii) of this subsection for each of the first 24 taxable years for which the credit
is allowed.
(m) (1) On October 1 [of each year], 2027, AND EACH OCTOBER 1
THEREAFTER, each county and municipal corporation that has granted tax credits under
this section shall report to the Department[, the Department of Commerce, and the
Comptroller]:
[(1)] (I) [the amount of] FOR each credit granted for that year, THE
FOLLOWING INFORMATION:
1. THE AMOUNT OF THE CREDIT;
2. THE NAME AND ADDRESS OF THE BUSINESS ENTITY;
3. THE INVESTMENT ASSOCIATED WITH THE CREDIT;
4. WHETHER THE CREDIT RESULTED FROM AN
EXPANSION, A RELOCATION, OR A NEW BUSINESS;
5. THE NUMBER OF JOBS ASSOCIATED WITH THE
CREDIT;

HOUSE BILL 983
6. WHETHER THE BUSINESS ENTITY HAD A PRESENCE IN
THE STATE PRIOR TO RECEIVING THE CREDIT AND THE BUSINESS ENTITY’S YEARS
OF OPERATION; AND
7. THE TOTAL NUMBER OF INDIVIDUALS EMPLOYED BY
THE BUSINESS ENTITY; and
[(2)] (II) whether the business entity is in compliance with the
requirements for the tax credit.
(2) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2027, AND EACH DECEMBER 31
THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL AGGREGATE THE REPORTS RECEIVED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND SUBMIT A COMBINED REPORT TO
THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, INCLUDING ANY FINDINGS OR RECOMMENDATIONS.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) On or before December 1, 2026, the Department of Commerce shall evaluate
the tax credit allowed under § 10–730 of the Tax – General Article, as enacted under Section
1 of this Act, and report to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, on the tax credit.
(b) The report under subsection (a) of this section shall include recommendations
on how the tax credit could be improved or streamlined, including potential reforms to:
(1) the list of eligible production activities;
(2) the small or independent film entity eligibility requirements, including
hiring requirements, and designated funding levels;
(3) the minimum in–State spending requirements for larger film
production entities; and
(4) the qualifying costs, including whether qualifying costs would be better
defined by administrative regulation.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall be
applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.
SECTION 7. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 4 of this Act shall be
applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2026.
SECTION 8. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Sections 2 and 3 of this Act
shall take effect July 1, 2026.

HOUSE BILL 983 27
SECTION 9. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in Section
8 of this Act, this Act shall take effect June 1, 2026.